Utah statutes.
41-1a-1207.   Reduced fees for portion of year.

If a motor vehicle exceeding 12,000 pounds gross laden weight is registered for less than a 12-month registration period, the registration fees are:

(1)  for not more than three months, 30% of the regular registration fee;

(2)  for in excess of three months but not more than six months, 60% of the regular registration fee;

(3)  for in excess of six months and not more than nine months, 90% of the regular registration fee; and

(4)  for anything in excess of nine months but not more than 12 months, the entire registration fee.

